__1st_try_roman_lexica__/prem.lexc
!!!prem.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Prem

LEXICON Root
Prem;

LEXICON PremInf
+Prem:0 #;

LEXICON Prem
!Lexical items from corpus
dyn	PremInf;
lħẓe	PremInf;
emyn	PremInf;
yk	PremInf;
eman	PremInf;
sa'tea	PremInf;
čndyn	PremInf;
čndan	PremInf;
emyn	PremInf;
kdam	PremInf;
čndy	PremInf;
eme	PremInf;
ezaran	PremInf;
eman	PremInf;
erče	PremInf;
tnea	PremInf;
če	PremInf;
kmy	PremInf;
de__ea	PremInf;
flan	PremInf;
er	PremInf;
čndşd	PremInf;
gaey	PremInf;
mylyardea	PremInf;
'jb	PremInf;
čnyn	PremInf;
akçr	PremInf;
pare	PremInf;
tk	PremInf;
eyč	PremInf;
brxy	PremInf;
andky	PremInf;
ezar	PremInf;
čgwne	PremInf;
xyly	PremInf;
bsyar	PremInf;
salyan	PremInf;
čnd	PremInf;
mŕdar	PremInf;
ān	PremInf;
ewar	PremInf;
mŕdary	PremInf;
an	PremInf;
mdt_ea	PremInf;
kmtr	PremInf;
srasr	PremInf;
dw	PremInf;
şdea	PremInf;
dygr	PremInf;
bdyn	PremInf;
čndmyn	PremInf;
sal_ea	PremInf;
ayn⁯	PremInf;
bsy	PremInf;
kdamyn	PremInf;
'de	PremInf;
ayn	PremInf;
'de_ay	PremInf;
bsyary	PremInf;
klye	PremInf;
mylywn	PremInf;
sal	PremInf;
čŕdr	PremInf;
grwe	PremInf;
eme	PremInf;
t'dady	PremInf;
t'dad	PremInf;
čnan	PremInf;
de_ea	PremInf;
abn	PremInf;
sa't_ea	PremInf;
grwey	PremInf;
b'źy	PremInf;
mylywn_ea	PremInf;
